Morphological-Analysis/Finnish-03/finnish.twol
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ä ö å
a:ä o:ö u:y

;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Sets 

Vowel =  a o u  ä ö y  e i  V ;

VowelBack = a o u  ;

VowelFront = ä ö y ;

VowelNeut = e i ;

Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Rules 

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! VOWEL HARMONY
!! explanation of fronting in /Finnish-02/
!! version 3: simplify fronting-2b: simpler version of the => rule
"Vowel FRONTING # 3b"
VowelBack:VowelFront /<=  :VowelBack  :* _  ; !! 3b

!! in the <= rule fronting-2a: flip the tapes of the CVnonb:@ symbol 
"Vowel FRONTING # 3a"
VowelBack:VowelFront <=  # [ :VowelFront | :VowelNeut | :Cons ]+ %>:  :* _  ; !! 3a

!! ensure that a morpheme boundary has been encountered: 
!! forbid back-to-front changes in the STEM!
"Vowel FRONTING # 1c"
VowelBack:VowelFront  => %>:  :* _  ; !! 1c


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! "Double a"   V:a  <=>  :a  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double e"   V:e  <=>  :e  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double i"   V:i  <=>  :i  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double o"   V:o  <=>  :o  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double u"   V:u  <=>  :u  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double y"   V:y  <=>  :y  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double ä"   V:ä  <=>  :ä  %>:  _  ;
!! "Double ö"   V:ö  <=>  :ö  %>:  _  ;

"VOWEL DOUBLING"   V:Vx  <=>  :Vy  %>:  _  ;
      where Vx in ( a e i o u y ä ö )
            Vy in ( a e i o u y ä ö )
      matched ;
